New Jersey, session 222, S4368.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    To the extent that there remains sufficient, uncommitted appropriations for grant issuance, the Department of Community Affairs shall resume the Reconstruction, Rehabilitation, Elevation and Mitigation program and accept grant applications to provide funding which was intended to fund the unmet needs of Superstorm Sandy-impacted homeowners, as defined pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2015, c.102 (C.52:15D-4), who are still in need of recovery and rebuilding financial assistance. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.